Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3874.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Federal Action
Liability Policy Act of 2026".
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14528 MAH 01/05/26






Req. No. 14528 Page 1